California statutes. Education Code
To the extent permitted by federal law, the State Department of Education shall adopt regulations to establish eligibility requirements for participation in the child care food program and to impose penalties and sanctions for noncompliance by sponsoring organizations. This section may not be construed to prohibit the State Department of Education from terminating contracts with sponsoring organizations. The State Department of Education is authorized to establish contracts effective for periods of 12 months or less for sponsoring organizations meeting the department’s high-risk profile.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 37.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

49546.

It is the intent of the Legislature that funding for costs for the implementation of this article shall come from either federal funds or transfer of funds appropriated for the support of the Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.7. Comprehensive Nutrition Services [49547. - 49548.3.]

49547.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) Proper nutrition for children is a matter of the highest state priority.

(2) There is a demonstrated relationship between the good nutrition practices on a year-round basis and the capacity of children to develop and learn.

(3) Teaching the principles of good nutrition in schools is urgently needed to assist children at all income levels in developing proper eating habits that are essential for lifelong good health and productivity.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that it is essential that schools, local governing boards, parents, and communities provide leadership and support for the establishment of nutrition program services for children on a year-round basis. The nutritional needs of children must continue to be met when school is not in session.

(c) The Legislature further recognizes the need to establish a permanent funding plan in order to provide qualifying local agencies with continuous financial support for the operation of child nutrition programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 948, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

49547.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Needy children rely upon school meals for supplemental nutrition that benefits their health, growth, and academic and social development.

(2) Existing federal law, Section 1761 of Title 42 of the United States Code, establishes the Summer Food Service Program. This program provides assistance to states to support the operation of nonprofit food service programs for needy children during those times of the year when free and reduced-price school meals are not available.

(b) The State Department of Education is designated the state agency
 for purposes of the Summer Food Service Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1761) and shall submit to the Western Regional Office of the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture a program management and administration plan. If the plan is approved, the department shall manage and administer the program.

(c) The provisions of Sections 49501.5, 49536, 49550, and 49559 do not apply to the Summer Food Service Program, as set forth in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 600, Sec. 14.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49548.

(a) The state board, in order to effect compliance with legislative findings expressed in Section 49547, shall restrict the criteria for the issuance of waivers from the requirements of Section 49550 to feed children during a summer school session. A waiver shall be granted for a period not to exceed one year if either of the following conditions exists:

(1) (A) A summer school session serving pupils enrolled in elementary school, as defined in clause (iii), shall be granted a waiver if a Summer Food Service Program for Children site is available within one-half mile of the schoolsite and either of the following conditions exists:

(i) The hours of operation of the Summer Food
 Service Program for Children site commence no later than one-half hour after the completion of the summer school session day.

(ii) The hours of operation of the Summer Food Service Program for Children site conclude no earlier than one hour after the completion of the summer school session day.

(iii) For purposes of this subdivision, “elementary school” means a public school that maintains kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 8, inclusive.

(B) A summer school session serving pupils enrolled in middle school, junior high school, or high school shall be granted a waiver if a Summer Food Service Program for Children site is available within one mile of the schoolsite and either of the following conditions exists:

(i) The hours of operation of the Summer Food
 Service Program for Children site commence no later than one-half hour after the completion of the summer school session day.

(ii) The hours of operation of the Summer Food Service Program for Children site conclude no earlier than one hour after the completion of the summer school session day.

(2) (A) Serving meals during the summer school session would result in a financial loss to the school district, documented in a financial analysis performed by the school district, in an amount equal to one-third of net cash resources, as defined in Section 210.2 of Part 210 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which, for purposes of this article, shall exclude funds that are encumbered. If there are no net cash resources, an amount equal to the operating costs of one month as averaged over the summer school sessions.

(B) The financial analysis required by subparagraph (A) shall include a projection of future meal program participation based on either of the following:

(i) Commencement of a meal service period after the commencement of the summer school session day and conclusion of a meal service period before the completion of the summer school session day.

(ii) Operation of a schoolsite as an open Summer Seamless Option or a Summer Food Service Program for Children site, and providing adequate notification thereof, including flyers and banners, in order to fulfill community needs under the Summer Food Service Program for Children (7 C.F.R. 225.14(d)(3)).

(3) The entire summer school day is two hours or less in duration.

(b) The state board and the Superintendent shall provide leadership to encourage and support schools and public agencies to participate in the Summer Food Service Program for Children, consistent with the intent of Section 49504.

(c) An application for a waiver shall be submitted no later than 60 days before the last regular meeting of the state board before the commencement of the summer school session for which the waiver is sought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 44.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

49548.2.

(a) The State Department of Education shall seek federal statutory amendments as follows:

(1) To cause the Summer Food Service Program for Children to become more compatible with the National School Lunch Program by defining “enrollment” to allow flexibility in the eligibility criteria for the National School Lunch Program in order that more children can be served during school vacation periods under an ongoing school lunch-breakfast program.

(2) To specifically authorize California to be a pilot for universal year-round feeding under the concept of comprehensive child nutrition programs.

(b) The State Department of Education shall work to expand coordinated services for children to include comprehensive nutrition program services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 948, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

49548.3.

The State Department of Education shall invite the United States Department of Agriculture to join the Child Nutrition and Food Distribution Division in its annual workshops and conferences to present information on the Summer Food Service Program for Children. The State Department of Education shall integrate information on the Summer Food Service Program for Children into nutritional activities, presentations, and contacts with professional groups, including the Association of California School Administrators, California Association of School Business Officials, California School Food Service Association, California Dietetic Association, and California Nutrition Council. In addition, the State Department of Education shall:

(a) Assist the United States Department of Agriculture in preparing and distributing outreach materials and presentations on the Summer Food Service Program for Children that target schools, public and private nonprofit agencies, including soup kitchens, homeless feeding sites, and other charitable institutions.

(b) Obtain from the United States Department of Agriculture the profile of participating agencies and then work cooperatively with that department in targeting those underserved areas for intensive outreach efforts.

(c) Establish linkages with other agencies and organizations to facilitate increasing the number of Summer Food Service Program for Children sponsors. These agencies may include, but not be limited to, the California Department of Parks and Recreation, League of California Cities, County Supervisors Association of California, California Hunger Action Coalition, and other organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 948, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Meals for Needy Pupils in Kindergarten and Grades 1 to 12 [49550.3. - 49564.5.]

49550.3.

(a) Because a hungry child cannot learn, the Legislature intends, as a state nutrition and health policy, that the federal School Breakfast Program be made available in all schools where it is needed to provide adequate nutrition for children in attendance.

(b) The department, in cooperation with school districts and county superintendents of schools, shall provide information and limited financial assistance to encourage program startup and expansion into all qualified schools, as follows:

(1) Provide information to school districts and county superintendents of schools concerning the benefits and availability of the federal School Breakfast Program.

(2) Each year, provide additional information and financial assistance to schools in the state, in which 20 percent or more of the school enrollment consists of children who have applied and qualify for free and reduced-price meals.

(c) The department shall award grants of up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per schoolsite on a competitive basis to school districts, county superintendents of schools, or entities approved by the department, limited to an amount subject to budget appropriations each fiscal year, for nonrecurring expenses incurred in initiating or expanding a school breakfast program under this section or a federal summer meals program, including the summer food service program pursuant to Article 10.7 (commencing with Section 49547) and the Seamless Summer Option component of the federal National School Lunch Program.

(d) Grants awarded under this section shall be used for nonrecurring costs of initiating or expanding a school breakfast program or a federal summer meals program, including the acquisition of equipment, training of staff in new capacities, outreach efforts to publicize new or expanded school breakfast programs or federal summer meals programs, minor alterations to accommodate new equipment, computer point-of-service systems for food service, and the purchase of vehicles for transporting food to schools. Funds may not be used for salaries and benefits of staff, food, computers, except computer point-of-service systems, or capital outlay.

(e) In making grant awards under this section in any fiscal year, the department shall give a preference to school districts and county superintendents of schools that do all of the following:

(1) Submit to the department a plan to start or expand school breakfast programs or federal summer meals programs in the school district or the county, including a description of the following:

(A) The manner in which the school district or county superintendent of schools will provide technical assistance and funding to schoolsites to expand those programs.

(B) Detailed information on the nonrecurring expenses needed to initiate a program.

(C) Public or private resources that have been assembled to carry out expansion of these programs during that year.

(2) Agree to operate the school breakfast program or the federal summer meals program for a period of not less than three years.

(3) Assure that the expenditure of funds from state and local resources for the maintenance of the school breakfast program or the federal summer meals program shall not be diminished as a result of grant awards received under this section.

(f) A grant awarded under this section may be used to implement a school breakfast program that serves breakfast after the start of the schoolday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 593, Sec. 5.   (AB 3043)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49550.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Cafeteria fund” means the nonprofit school food service account, as defined in Section 210.2 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Educational entity” means a school district, county office of education, private nonprofit school, charter school, or residential child care institution, as defined in Section 210.2 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations within the definition of “school.”

(3) “Universal breakfast” means a nutritionally adequate breakfast that complies with, and qualifies for reimbursement under, the federal School
 Breakfast Program and that is provided to every pupil at no charge.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2019–20 school year, an educational entity that participates in the federal School Breakfast Program may, to the maximum extent practicable, provide universal breakfast. Except as provided in paragraph (2), an educational entity that seeks to use the cafeteria fund to supplement meal costs for universal breakfast shall submit to the department for approval before implementing universal breakfast pursuant to this section, on or before July 1 of each year, an application, signed by the educational entity’s governing board or governing body, certifying that the educational entity will provide breakfasts at no charge to all pupils and cover with nonfederal funds any costs of providing those breakfasts to all pupils above the amount provided in federal reimbursement.

(2) The requirement to submit an application to the department in paragraph (1) does not apply to an educational entity that participates in a federally authorized provision pursuant to which the educational entity provides universal breakfast, including, but not limited to, Provision 1, 2, or 3, or the Community Eligibility Provision of the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1751 et seq.).

(c) Contributions that are a direct support of universal breakfast may be used to offset operation costs. These contributions may include the following:

(1) Funds from the cafeteria fund.

(2) Funds provided to support universal breakfast by organizations, including, but not limited to, school-related and community groups or by the city, county, city and county, or
 state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 593, Sec. 6.   (AB 3043)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49551.

The State Board of Education shall adopt regulations prescribing standards and guidelines for carrying out the purposes of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49552.

For the purposes of this article, needy children shall be defined as those children who meet federal eligibility criteria for free and reduced price meals as defined in Section 49531, except for family day care homes which shall be reimbursed for 75 percent of the meals.

The amendments to this section enacted by the Legislature in the 1982 portion of the 1981–82 Regular Session of the Legislature shall apply retroactively to July 1, 1981, to the extent that they may legally do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 209, Sec. 14.6.   Effective May 20, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

49553.

(a) A nutritionally adequate meal, for the purposes of this article, is a breakfast or lunch as defined in Section 49531 that qualifies for reimbursement under the federal child nutrition program regulations.

(b) (1) (A) For the purposes of special school nutrition supplements provided to pregnant or lactating pupils under Section 49559, protein and grain meal components for any given day shall, together, offer a total of five ounces of protein, one ounce of which shall be cheese or eight ounces of milk and three servings from the grain group, preferably whole and nutritious grains. This may be accomplished by adding one ounce of protein and one serving from the grain group at breakfast or serving these as a snack, and by adding one or two ounces of protein, one ounce of which shall be cheese or eight ounces of milk, to lunch, or by offering a morning supplement consisting of two or three ounces of protein, one ounce of which must be cheese, or eight ounces of milk, and one or two servings from the grain group.

(B) Meal components where only breakfast is served shall be increased to a total including one ounce of protein and two servings from the grain group, preferably whole and nutritious grains.

(C) Where both breakfast and lunch are provided, they shall, together, provide a total of five ounces of protein foods, one ounce of which shall be cheese, three servings from the grain group, preferably whole and nutritious grains, one and one-fourth cups from the fruit and vegetable group, and one pint from the milk group.

(2) The following options shall be allowed:

(A) One cup of fruit in place of one serving of the grain group, once a week.

(B) One cup of yogurt, made with pasteurized milk, in place of eight ounces of milk or one ounce of cheese, up to two times per week.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1078) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 34.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

49554.

Any school district or county superintendent of schools which has had no food service employees since July 1, 1977, or has inadequate or no food preparation facilities as determined by the State Department of Education, and is, therefore, unable to provide a nutritionally adequate breakfast or lunch, or both, may contract for the preparation, delivery, and service of those meals. Any contract for the preparation, delivery, and service of meals shall not be deemed to establish food service positions for the purposes of Section 39902.

Prior to contracting for preparation, delivery, and service of such meals, a school district shall certify to the State Department of Education that no school district in the county nor the county superintendent of schools has the facilities and is willing to furnish those services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49556.

The Superintendent shall supervise the implementation of this article and shall investigate acts of alleged noncompliance. If the Superintendent finds that a school district or county superintendent of schools has failed to comply with this article, the Superintendent shall certify the noncompliance. The Superintendent shall conduct an investigation as may be necessary to document the noncompliance. The Superintendent, in the Superintendent’s discretion, shall seek injunctive relief to secure compliance with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 45.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

49557.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district and the county superintendent of schools shall make paper applications for free or reduced-price meals available to pupils at all times during each regular schoolday, and may also make an application electronically available online, provided that the online application complies with paragraph (3). Pursuant to federal and state guidelines, the application shall contain clear instructions for families that are homeless or are migrants, and shall also contain, in at least 8-point boldface type, each of the following statements:

(A) Applications for free and reduced-price meals may be submitted
 at any time during a schoolday.

(B) Children participating in the federal National School Lunch Program will not be overtly identified by the use of special tokens, special tickets, special serving lines, separate entrances, separate dining areas, or by any other means.

(2) A school district and the county superintendent of schools shall use all other paper applications it has for free or reduced-price meals before utilizing the applications pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) If a governing board of a school
 district, a county office of education, or a school food authority chooses to provide access to an online application for free or reduced-price meals pursuant to paragraph (1), the online application shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(A) Include a link to the Internet Web site on which translated applications are posted by the United States Department of Agriculture, with instructions in that language that
 inform the applicant how to submit the application. The Legislature finds and declares that federal guidelines require school food authorities to accept and process these applications if they are submitted to the school food authority.

(B) Require completion of only those questions that are necessary for determining eligibility.

(C) Include clear instructions for families that are homeless or are migrants.

(D) Comply with the privacy rights and disclosure protections established by the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act (Public Law 113-79) and the federal Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-277).

(E) Include links to all of the following:

(i) The online application to CalFresh.

(ii) The online single state application for health care.

(iii) The Internet Web page maintained by the State Department of Public Health entitled “About WIC and How to Apply,” or another Internet Web page identified by the State Department of Public Health that connects families to the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children.

(iv) The Internet Web site of a summer lunch program authorized to participate within the city or school district.

(F) No online application for free or
 reduced-price meals shall be made available online or made accessible online by a school district, a county office of education, or a school food authority if the online application allows for the information provided by an applicant to be used by a private entity for any purpose not related to the administration of a school food program, or if the online application requires an applicant to waive any right or to create a user account in order to submit the application.

(b) The governing board of each school district and each county superintendent of schools shall formulate a plan, which shall be mailed to the State Department of Education for its approval, that will ensure that children eligible to receive free or reduced-price meals and milk shall not be treated differently from other children. These plans shall ensure each of the following:

(1) Unless otherwise specified, the names of the children shall not be published, posted, or announced in any manner, or used for any purpose other than the federal National School Lunch Program.

(2) There shall be no overt identification of any of the children by the use of special tokens or tickets or by any other
 means.

(3) The children shall not be required to work for their meals or milk.

(4) The children shall not be required to use a separate dining area, go through a separate serving line, enter the dining area through a separate entrance, or consume their meals or milk at a
 different time.

(c) When more than one lunch or breakfast or type of milk is offered pursuant to this article, the children shall have the same choice of meals or milk that is available to those children who pay the full price for their meal or milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 390, Sec. 2.   (SB 708)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

49557.1.

In making available to pupils the application for participation in the free or reduced-price meal program provided for under subdivision (a) of Section 49557, each school district and county superintendent of schools is encouraged to include information that parents may use to request information concerning the Medi-Cal program administered pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the Healthy Families Program, administered pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code. School districts and county superintendents of schools are encouraged to perform this task in the most cost-beneficial manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 1.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

49557.2.

(a) (1) At the option of the school district or county superintendent, and to the extent necessary to implement Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the following information may be incorporated into the School Lunch Program application packet or notification of eligibility for the School Lunch Program using simple and culturally appropriate language:

(A) A notification that if a child qualifies for free school lunches, then the child may qualify for free or reduced-cost health coverage.

(B) A request for the applicant’s consent for the child to participate in the Medi-Cal program, if eligible for free school lunches,
 and to have the information on the school lunch application shared with the entity designated by the State Department of Health Care Services to make an accelerated determination and the local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program.

(C) A notification that the school district will not forward the school lunch application to the entity designated by the State Department of Health Care Services to make an accelerated determination and the local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program, without the consent of the child’s parent or guardian.

(D) A notification that the school lunch application is confidential and, with the exception of forwarding the information for use in health program enrollment upon the consent of the child’s parent or guardian, the school district will not share the information with any other governmental agency,
 including the federal Department of Homeland Security and the Social Security Administration.

(E) A notification that the school lunch application information will only be used by the entity designated by the State Department of Health Care Services to make an accelerated determination and the state and local agencies that administer the Medi-Cal program for purposes directly related to the administration of the Medi-Cal program and will not be shared with other governmental agencies, including the federal Department of Homeland Security and the Social Security Administration for any purpose other than the administration of the Medi-Cal program.

(F) Information regarding the Medi-Cal program, including available services, program requirements, rights and responsibilities, and privacy and confidentiality requirements.

(2) The department, in consultation with school districts, county superintendents of schools, consumer advocates, counties, the State Department of Health Care Services, and other stakeholders, shall make recommendations regarding the School Lunch Program application, on or before February 1, 2003. The recommendations shall include specific changes to the School Lunch Program application materials as necessary to implement Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, information for staff as to how to implement the changes, and a description of the process by which information on the School Lunch Program application will be shared with the county, as the local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program.

(3) At the option of the school, the request for consent in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) may be modified so that the parent or guardian can also consent to allowing Medi-Cal to inform the school as
 provided in subdivision (n) of Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code when followup is needed in order to complete the Medi-Cal application process.

(b) (1) School districts and county superintendents of schools may implement a process to share information provided on the School Lunch Program application with the entity designated by the State Department of Health Care Services to make an accelerated determination and with the local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program, and shall share this information with those entities, if the applicant consents to that sharing of information. Schools may designate, only as necessary to implement this section, nonfood service staff to assist in the administration of free, reduced price, or paid school lunch applications that have applicant consent, but only if that designation does not displace or have an adverse effect on food service staff. This
 information may be shared electronically, physically, or through whatever method is determined appropriate.

(2) If a school is aware that a child, who has been found eligible for free school lunches under the National School Lunch Program, and for whom the parent or guardian has consented to share the information provided on the application, already has an active Medi-Cal or Healthy Families case, the application shall not be processed for an accelerated determination but shall be forwarded to the local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The school shall notify the parent or guardian of the child’s ineligibility for an accelerated Medi-Cal determination due to the current eligibility status and that the child’s application will be forwarded to the county pursuant to this section. The notice shall include a statement, with contact information, advising
 the parent or guardian to contact the Medi-Cal or Healthy Families programs regarding the child’s eligibility status.

(3) Each school district or county superintendent that chooses to share information pursuant to this subdivision shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program, that sets forth the roles and responsibilities of each agency and the process to be used in sharing the information.

(4) The local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program shall only use information provided by applicants on the school lunch application for purposes directly related to the administration of the Medi-Cal program.

(5) After school districts share information regarding the school lunch application with the entity designated by the
 State Department of Health Care Services to make an accelerated determination and the local agency that determines eligibility under the Medi-Cal program, for the purpose of determining Medi-Cal program eligibility, the local agency and the school district shall not share information about school lunch participation or the Medi-Cal program eligibility information with each other except as specifically authorized under subdivision (n) of Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and other provisions of law.

(c) Effective July 1, 2005, the notifications and consent referenced in subdivision (a) and the procedures set out in subdivision (b) shall include the Healthy Families Program and any relevant county- and local-sponsored health insurance programs as necessary to implement Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) Effective January 1, 2014, the
 notifications referenced in subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) Advise the applicant that the applicant may be eligible for reduced-cost comprehensive health care coverage through the California Health Benefit Exchange.

(2) Advise that, if the applicant’s family income is low, the applicant may be eligible for no-cost coverage through Medi-Cal.

(3) Provide the applicant with the contact information for the California Health Benefit Exchange, including its Internet Web site and telephone number.

(4) Comply with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and any other applicable federal or state disabled access law.

(e) If a school
 district finds that the child is eligible for reduced price or paid meals under the National School Lunch Program and consent was provided as described in subdivision (b), the entity designated by the State Department of Health Care Services to make an accelerated determination shall notify the parent or guardian of the child’s ineligibility for an accelerated Medi-Cal determination pursuant to Section 14005.41 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The notification shall include information on other available health programs for which the child may be eligible.

(f) A school district may also include the notifications in the notifications at the beginning of the first semester or quarter of the regular school term required pursuant to Section 48980.

(g) Upon receipt of information provided on the School Lunch Program application pursuant to this section, for a pupil who is not
 already enrolled in a health insurance affordability program, the county shall treat the School Lunch Program application as an application for a health insurance affordability program. For purposes of administration of the Medi-Cal program, the application date shall be the date that the School Lunch Program application is received by the county human services department. The county shall take no further action if it determines that the pupil is already enrolled in a health insurance affordability program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 40.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

49557.3.

(a) Each school district or county office of education, at its option, may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the local agency that determines CalFresh program eligibility, or its designee, to share information provided on the School Lunch Program application with that agency, if the child is approved for free meals or, if included in the memorandum of understanding, reduced-price meals, and if the applicant consents to the sharing of that information. The information may be shared electronically, physically, or through whatever method is determined appropriate. Any memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant to this section shall set forth
 the roles and responsibilities of the school district or county office of education and the local agency, and the process to be used in sharing the information.

(b) The local agency that determines CalFresh program eligibility shall use information provided on a School Lunch Program application only for purposes directly related to the enrollment of families in the CalFresh program.

(c) The School Lunch Program application is confidential, and, with the exception of forwarding the information on the application for use in CalFresh program enrollment consistent with Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code upon the consent of the pupil’s parent or guardian, the school district, county superintendent of schools, or CalFresh program administrators shall not share the information with any other governmental agency,
 including the federal Immigration and Naturalization Service and the Social Security Administration, or use the information for any purpose other than enrollment in the CalFresh program.

(d) After a school district or county office of education shares information provided on a School Lunch Program application with the local agency that determines CalFresh program eligibility, or its designee, for the purpose of determining the applicant’s eligibility for the CalFresh program, the school district or county office of education and the local agency, or its designee, shall not share information about the applicant or his or her household with each other, or any other entity, unless specifically authorized to do so pursuant to other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 504, Sec. 1.   (AB 402)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

49557.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 49076, 49557.3, and 49558, and accompanying regulations, the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services may share data for the limited purpose of administering the Pandemic Electronic Benefit Transfer (P-EBT) food benefit program established pursuant to Public Law 116-127, including, but not limited to, identifying eligible students and evaluating program outcomes.

(b) The authority provided by this section shall continue until the P-EBT program established pursuant to Public Law 116-127 has been terminated pursuant to federal law or federal approval to administer the program has expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.   (AB 172)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

49557.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school, school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(b) (1) A local educational agency shall ensure that a pupil is not denied an available reimbursable meal of the pupil’s choice and is not shamed or treated differently from other pupils due to the pupil’s eligibility for free or reduced-price meals. This paragraph does not prohibit a school from serving an alternative reimbursable meal to a pupil who may need one for dietary or religious reasons, or as a regular menu item.

(2) If a local educational agency is required to provide to the department or to the United States Department of
 Agriculture a copy of the meal charge policy required pursuant to memorandum SP 46-2016 issued by the United States Department of Agriculture, the local educational agency or governing board or body of the local educational agency, as applicable, shall make that policy public.

(c) School personnel and volunteers at a local educational agency that serves nutritionally adequate meals to pupils during the instructional day shall not allow any disciplinary action that is taken against a pupil to result in the denial or delay of a nutritionally adequate breakfast or a nutritionally adequate lunch, as defined in Section 49553, to that pupil.

(d) A local educational agency shall not take any action directed at a pupil to collect school meal fees.

(e) This section shall only apply to a local educational agency that provides